Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1343.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "vehicle" in section 102 of the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act, is amended to read:Section 102. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Vehicle."(1) Every device which is or may be moved or drawn upon a highway, except devices which are infrequently operated or moved upon a highway but are designed primarily for use in construction or agriculture or road maintenance, devices 1234567891011121314151617181920 moved by human or animal power, devices used exclusively upon rails or tracks, motorized pedalcycles and mobility vehicles.(2) For purposes of sections 307, 307.1, 308, 309, 310, 311, 312, 313, 314, 315, 316, 317, 318 and 326, the term does not include a trailer, regardless of its gross vehicle weight, that is not a recreational vehicle.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1343PN1532 - 2 - 12345678